Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-129
Disorderly conduct; power to prevent.

A city of the second class shall have the power to prevent intoxication, fighting, quarreling, dog fights, cock fights, and all disorderly conduct.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 5023;

C.S.1922, § 4192;

C.S.1929, § 17-131;

R.S.1943, § 17-129;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 23.

The power of municipalities to define and punish the offense of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor is not limited by state laws regulating motor vehicle traffic. Gembler v. City of Seward, 136 Neb. 196, 285 N.W. 542 (1939), modified on rehearing 136 Neb. 916, 288 N.W. 545 (1939).